Maryland, session 2026, SB0642.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
12–102.
This title applies only in Baltimore City.
12–403.
(a) This section applies to a Class 7 micro–brewery license in the City.
(b) (1) The license may be issued only to the holder of:
[(1)] (I) a Class B beer, wine, and liquor (on–sale) license that is issued
for use on the premises of a restaurant located in the City; or
[(2)] (II) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, a Class
[D] B–D–7 alcoholic beverages license that is issued for use on the premises of the existing
Class [D] B–D–7 license located in the [40th] 46TH alcoholic beverages district of the City.

SENATE BILL 642 3
(2) THE BOARD MAY ISSUE A LICENSE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(II) OF
THIS SUBSECTION IF THE HOLDER OF THE CLASS B–D–7 LICENSE RECEIVES A
LETTER OF SUPPORT FROM THE RIDGELY’S DELIGHT ASSOCIATION.
(c) (1) Subject to paragraphs (2), (3), and (4) of this subsection, the holder of a
Class 7 micro–brewery license may:
(i) brew in two locations using the same Class 7 micro–brewery
license; and
(ii) obtain a Class 2 rectifying license for the premises at the two
locations authorized under item (i) of this paragraph.
(2) The holder of a Class 7 micro–brewery license may brew in two locations
using the same Class 7 micro–brewery license if the license holder:
(i) requests permission by submitting a written application to the
Executive Director; and
(ii) obtains written approval from the Executive Director.
(3) Before authorizing a holder of a Class 7 micro–brewery license to brew
in two locations using the same Class 7 micro–brewery license, the Executive Director shall:
(i) make a determination that a second location to brew additional
capacity is necessary due to insufficient space at the existing Class 7 license location; and
(ii) consider any other factor relevant to approval of the application.
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, a holder of a Class
7 micro–brewery license may not serve or sell beer for on– or off–premises consumption at
the second brewing location authorized under this subsection.
12–1408.
(A) (1) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2027, THE BOARD SHALL ESTABLISH
A STANDARD TEMPLATE FOR MEMORANDA OF UNDERSTANDING BETWEEN
APPLICANTS FOR ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES LICENSES AND LOCAL NEIGHBORHOOD
ASSOCIATIONS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS TITLE.
(2) INDIVIDUAL NEIGHBORHOOD ASSOCIATIONS MAY INCLUDE
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION ON THE STANDARD TEMPLATE ESTABLISHED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(B) IF AN APPLICANT FOR THE ISSUANCE OF A NEW, TRANSFERRED, OR
EXPANDED ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES LICENSE IS REQUIRED TO SUBMIT A

SENATE BILL 642
MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING, THE BOARD MAY NOT CONSIDER THE
APPLICATION TO BE COMPLETE UNLESS A COMPLETED MEMORANDUM OF
UNDERSTANDING IS INCLUDED WITH THE APPLICATION.
12–1604.
(a) This section applies only to the 46th alcoholic beverages district, which at all
times is coterminous with the 46th legislative district in the Legislative Districting Plan of
2022.
(K) THE BOARD MAY AUTHORIZE THE TRANSFER OF A CLASS B–D–7
LICENSE FROM THE 700 BLOCK OF WASHINGTON BOULEVARD IN THE 40TH
ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES DISTRICT FOR USE BY AN ESTABLISHMENT ON THE 200
BLOCK OF SOUTH HIGH STREET IN THE 46TH ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES DISTRICT.
12–1604.2.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO A HOLDER OF A CLASS D LICENSE FOR
USE IN THE 46TH ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES DISTRICT.
(B) (1) NOTWITHSTANDING § 12–2004(F) OF THIS TITLE, A HOLDER OF A
VALID CLASS D LICENSE MAY APPLY TO THE BOARD TO SELL ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES
MONDAY THROUGH SUNDAY IF THE LICENSE HOLDER:
(I) MAINTAINS AVERAGE DAILY RECEIPTS FROM THE SALE OF
FOOD THAT ARE AT LEAST 51% OF THE TOTAL DAILY RECEIPTS FROM THE
ESTABLISHMENT;
(II) EXECUTES A MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING WITH THE
RELEVANT LOCAL NEIGHBORHOOD ASSOCIATION AS DETERMINED BY THE BOARD;
(III) OPERATES AN ESTABLISHMENT WITH NOT MORE THAN 100
SEATS; AND
(IV) PAYS A ONE–TIME FEE OF $15,000, IN ADDITION TO ANNUAL
RENEWAL FEES ASSOCIATED WITH THE CLASS D LICENSE.
(2) (I) A CLASS D LICENSE THAT IS GRANTED A 7–DAY PRIVILEGE
UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT BE TRANSFERRED TO A NEW LOCATION.
(II) A NEW HOLDER OF A CLASS D LICENSE THAT IS GRANTED A
7–DAY PRIVILEGE UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MUST COMPLY WITH THE
REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBSECTION.

SENATE BILL 642 5
(C) THE BOARD SHALL USE THE ONE–TIME FEE PAID BY THE LICENSE
HOLDER UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(1)(IV) OF THIS SECTION FOR ENFORCEMENT OF
THE MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(1)(II)
OF THIS SECTION.
12–2802.
(G) THE BOARD SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT ESTABLISH TIERED
PENALTIES FOR VIOLATIONS UNDER THIS TITLE, INCLUDING THE REVOCATION OF A
7–DAY SALES PRIVILEGE GRANTED UNDER § 12–1604.2 OF THIS TITLE IF THE
LICENSEE VIOLATES THE PROVISIONS OF THE REQUIRED MEMORANDUM OF
UNDERSTANDING THREE OR MORE TIMES WITHIN A 2–YEAR PERIOD.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, notwithstanding §§ 6–308
and 6–311 of the Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis Article, a licensed establishment on
the south side of the unit block of West Pratt Street may keep and allow individuals to
consume on the licensed premises alcoholic beverages donated by a manufacturer or
wholesaler if:
(1) the alcoholic beverages are donated and served at an event for which a
nonprofit entity has rented the licensed premises;
(2) the licensee has provided to the Board of License Commissioners for
Baltimore City evidence of the nonprofit status of the entity renting the licensed premises;
(3) the licensee serves the alcohol donated for the event;
(4) any related taxes have been remitted; and
(5) the licensee only keeps and serves alcoholic beverages in conjunction
with a single rental contract.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, notwithstanding:
(a) Notwithstanding § 12–1705 of the Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis Article,
a Class D beer and wine license issued for a premises in the 800 block of St. Paul Street shall
be considered unexpired until July 1, 2027, for the purpose of completing a transfer of
ownership at the same location.
(b) Notwithstanding § 12–2202 of the Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis Article,
a Class B beer, wine, and liquor license issued for a premises in the 6500 block of Eastern
Avenue shall be considered unexpired until the end of July 1, 2027, for the purpose of being
renewed to the current license year by the licensee.
(c) Notwithstanding § 12–2202 of the Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis Article,
a Class B–D–7 beer, wine, and liquor license issued for a premises in the 1600 block of

SENATE BILL 642
Eastern Avenue shall be considered unexpired until the end of July 1, 2027, for the purpose
of being renewed to the current license year and transferred to a new owner at a premises
in the 700 block of Aliceanna Street.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026. Section 2 of this Act shall remain effective for a period of 2 years and, at the end of
May 31, 2028, Section 2 of this Act, with no further action required by the General
Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.